Alabama, session 2026rs, HB447.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) Any individual who is a resident of
Montgomery County and who has made a will may file the will in
the Office of the Judge of Probate of Montgomery County.
(b) The judge of probate shall maintain a docket in
which he or she shall register the will, the date on which it
was deposited in his or her office, and the date of withdrawal
of the will.
(c) The files shall be confidential and no individual
other than the individual depositing the will, his or her
legal representative, or his or her attorney may have access
to the file prior to the death of the individual making and
depositing the will.
(d) The docket shall be available for inspection by the
public.
Section 2. The judge of probate may charge a reasonable
fee for each will filed with his or her office.
Section 3. Nothing in this act may be construed to
prohibit any individual from revoking a will by the execution
of a subsequent will or to change the ambulatory nature of the
will of any individual.
Section 4. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 1

Section 4. This act shall become effective immediately.
HB447 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 05-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 17-Mar-26 Passed



Page 2